Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-723
Hunting; privately owned land; posting.

In the interest of providing access to more private property for the privilege of hunting and in protecting the property rights of the landowners and tenants of farms and ranches, it shall be lawful to post private property as provided in section 37-724.

Laws 1963, c. 199, § 1, p. 646;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-213.02;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 337.